Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska44-4423
Rules and regulations.

The director shall adopt and promulgate rules and regulations relating to risk retention groups necessary to carry out the Risk Retention Act.

Laws 1987, LB 514, § 23.